Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 32 Poultry

Cross references. —

For authority of officers or agents of livestock board to enter premises, to inspect poultry, see §

11-18-113

.

As to transporting poultry by vehicle, see §§

11-21-102

to

11-21-104

.

As to transportation of poultry unlawfully obtained or killed, and as to seizure and sale of vehicles and contents, see §

11-30-107

.

As to livestock feedlot operations, see ch. 39 of this title.

As to cooperative marketing associations, see §§

17-10-101

to

17-10-253

.

As to food safety system, see §

35-7-123

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 28, 32, 36-38; 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals § 1 et seq.; 35A Am. Jur. 2d Food §§ 23 to 26, 28 to 30, 33.

Injunction to restrain repeated or continuing trespasses by livestock and fowls, 60 ALR2d 310.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture § 3; 3A C.J.S. Animals § 1 et seq.

§ 11-32-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Baby poultry” means poultry under ten (10) weeks of age;

“Board” means the Wyoming livestock board;

“Breeding stock” means poultry used for reproduction;

“Poultry” means live chickens, turkeys, ducks, geese and game birds as defined by W.S. 23-1-101(a)(iv);

“This act” means W.S.

11-32-101

through

11-32-104

.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 145, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-595; W.S. 1977, §

11-37-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-32-102.
Rules and regulations.

The board may adopt rules
and regulations to carry out this act and to prevent the spread of
disease among poultry.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 145, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-596; W.S. 1977, §

11-37-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-32-101(a)(v).

§ 11-32-103.
Labeling of shipments.

Each container of poultry, baby poultry, hatching eggs or breeding stock sold within or imported into this state, except those containing poultry for immediate slaughter, shall bear the name and address of the shipper and an official label or certificate showing:

The number, breed and variety, sex and date of hatch for baby poultry;

The name of the hatchery or person producing poultry in the case of baby poultry;

The agency under the supervision of which the testing for pullorum disease was done, the pullorum classification; and

In the case of breeding stock, the pullorum classification and date of last test.

No person shall import into Wyoming any poultry, baby poultry, hatching eggs or breeding stock which is not labelled as provided by subsection (a) of this section except for immediate slaughter.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 145, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-597; W.S. 1977, §

11-37-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-32-104.
Penalty; seizure of property.

Any person who violates W.S.

11-32-101

through

11-32-103

or any rule or regulation promulgated hereunder shall
be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00). Any container
of poultry, baby poultry, hatching eggs or breeding stock which is
not labeled in accordance with the provisions of this act or rules
and regulations may be seized and its contents destroyed or returned
to the shipper at the shipper’s expense, as the board determines.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 145, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-599; W.S. 1977, §

11-37-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-32-101(a)(v).